Massachusetts, session 194th, H2475.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 54A of chapter 71 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “eleven C“, in line 3, the
following words:- or a licensed athletic trainer, who have completed the annual head injury
safety training, as required by 105 CMR 201.007.
SECTION 2. Said section 54A of said chapter 71 is hereby further amended by inserting
at the end thereof the following new paragraph:- A licensed athletic trainer shall be employed by
a superintendent or school committee at every high school in the commonwealth offering
interscholastic athletic activities.
of 2

SECTION 3. Section 8A (b)(7) of chapter 69 is hereby amended by inserting the word
“athletic” after “coaches” and before “trainers”. Section 8A (c) of chapter 69 is hereby amended
by inserting the word “athletic” after “coaches” and before “trainers”.
of 2